hu: VoIP protokoll támogatása: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Egyéb
pl: Obsługa protokołu Voip: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Inne
sk-SK: Podpora protokolu VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Iné
nb: Voip-protokollstøtte: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Annet
fr: Prise en charge du protocole VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Autre
tr: Voip Protokolü Desteği: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Diğer
lt-LT: VoIP protokolo palaikymas: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Kita
de: VoIP-Protokollunterstützung: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Sonstiges
cs: Podpora protokolu VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Jiné
hr-HR: Podrška za VoIP protokol: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Ostalo
ro-RO: Acceptare protocol VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Altele
bg-BG: Поддръжка на VDI протокол: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Други
el: Υποστήριξη πρωτοκόλλου VoIP: H.323+; ΙΑΧ; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Άλλο
ru: Поддержка протокола VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Другой
it: Supporto del protocollo VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Altro
es: Compatibilidad del protocolo VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Otros
sv: Stöd för Voip-protokoll: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Övrigt
ja: VoIPプロトコルに対応: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; その他
fi: Voip-protokollan tuki: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Muu
nl: Ondersteuning voor VoIP-protocol: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Andere
vi: Hỗ trợ giao thức Voip: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Khác
th: รองรับโปรโตคอล Voip: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; อื่นๆ
ko: VoIP 프로토콜 지원: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; 기타
en: VoIP protocol support: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Other
da: Understøttelse af VOIP-protokol: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Andet
pt-BR: Suporte ao protocolo VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Outro
zh-CN: VoIP 协议支持: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; 其他
pt-PT: Assistência ao protocolo VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Outro
zh-TW: VoIP 協定支援: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; 其他
sl-SI: Podpora za protokol VoIP: H.323; IAX; MGCP; RTP; SCCP; SIP; Drugo